Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.901

Construction—Prevention services.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the department's authority to offer or provide prevention services or primary prevention services as defined in chapters 13.34 and 74.13 RCW, respectively.

[ 2019 c 172 s 16.]